norm.foma
define NormalizeCharactersBase 
# For g2p.
# New stylized chars:
[ａ|Ａ] -> {a} || _ ,, 
[ｂ|Ｂ] -> {b} || _ ,, 
[ｃ|Ｃ] -> {c} || _ ,, 
[ｄ|Ｄ] -> {d} || _ ,, 
[ｅ|Ｅ] -> {e} || _ ,, 
[ｆ|Ｆ] -> {f} || _ ,, 
[ｇ|Ｇ] -> {g} || _ ,, 
[ｈ|Ｈ] -> {h} || _ ,, 
[ｉ|Ｉ] -> {i} || _ ,, 
[ｊ|Ｊ] -> {j} || _ ,, 
[ｋ|Ｋ] -> {k} || _ ,, 
[ｌ|Ｌ] -> {l} || _ ,, 
[ｍ|Ｍ] -> {m} || _ ,, 
[ｎ|Ｎ] -> {n} || _ ,, 
[ｏ|Ｏ] -> {o} || _ ,, 
[ｐ|Ｐ] -> {p} || _ ,, 
[ｑ|Ｑ] -> {q} || _ ,, 
[ｒ|Ｒ] -> {r} || _ ,, 
[ｓ|Ｓ] -> {s} || _ ,, 
[ｔ|Ｔ] -> {t} || _ ,, 
[ｕ|Ｕ] -> {u} || _ ,, 
[ｖ|Ｖ] -> {v} || _ ,, 
[ｗ|Ｗ] -> {w} || _ ,, 
[ｘ|Ｘ] -> {x} || _ ,, 
[ｙ|Ｙ] -> {y} || _ ,, 
[ｚ|Ｚ] -> {z} || _ ,, 
[𝐚|𝐀] -> {a} || _ ,, 
[𝐛|𝐁] -> {b} || _ ,, 
[𝐜|𝐂] -> {c} || _ ,, 
[𝐝|𝐃] -> {d} || _ ,, 
[𝐞|𝐄] -> {e} || _ ,, 
[𝐟|𝐅] -> {f} || _ ,, 
[𝐠|𝐆] -> {g} || _ ,, 
[𝐡|𝐇] -> {h} || _ ,, 
[𝐢|𝐈] -> {i} || _ ,, 
[𝐣|𝐉] -> {j} || _ ,, 
[𝐤|𝐊] -> {k} || _ ,, 
[𝐥|𝐋] -> {l} || _ ,, 
[𝐦|𝐌] -> {m} || _ ,, 
[𝐧|𝐍] -> {n} || _ ,, 
[𝐨|𝐎] -> {o} || _ ,, 
[𝐩|𝐏] -> {p} || _ ,, 
[𝐪|𝐐] -> {q} || _ ,, 
[𝐫|𝐑] -> {r} || _ ,, 
[𝐬|𝐒] -> {s} || _ ,, 
[𝐭|𝐓] -> {t} || _ ,, 
[𝐮|𝐔] -> {u} || _ ,, 
[𝐯|𝐕] -> {v} || _ ,, 
[𝐰|𝐖] -> {w} || _ ,, 
[𝐱|𝐗] -> {x} || _ ,, 
[𝐲|𝐘] -> {y} || _ ,, 
[𝐳|𝐙] -> {z} || _ ,, 
[𝗮|𝗔] -> {a} || _ ,, 
[𝗯|𝗕] -> {b} || _ ,, 
[𝗰|𝗖] -> {c} || _ ,, 
[𝗱|𝗗] -> {d} || _ ,, 
[𝗲|𝗘] -> {e} || _ ,, 
[𝗳|𝗙] -> {f} || _ ,, 
[𝗴|𝗚] -> {g} || _ ,, 
[𝗵|𝗛] -> {h} || _ ,, 
[𝗶|𝗜] -> {i} || _ ,, 
[𝗷|𝗝] -> {j} || _ ,, 
[𝗸|𝗞] -> {k} || _ ,, 
[𝗹|𝗟] -> {l} || _ ,, 
[𝗺|𝗠] -> {m} || _ ,, 
[𝗻|𝗡] -> {n} || _ ,, 
[𝗼|𝗢] -> {o} || _ ,, 
[𝗽|𝗣] -> {p} || _ ,, 
[𝗾|𝗤] -> {q} || _ ,, 
[𝗿|𝗥] -> {r} || _ ,, 
[𝘀|𝗦] -> {s} || _ ,, 
[𝘁|𝗧] -> {t} || _ ,, 
[𝘂|𝗨] -> {u} || _ ,, 
[𝘃|𝗩] -> {v} || _ ,, 
[𝘄|𝗪] -> {w} || _ ,, 
[𝘅|𝗫] -> {x} || _ ,, 
[𝘆|𝗬] -> {y} || _ ,, 
[𝘇|𝗭] -> {z} || _ ,, 
[𝘢|𝘈] -> {a} || _ ,, 
[𝘣|𝘉] -> {b} || _ ,, 
[𝘤|𝘊] -> {c} || _ ,, 
[𝘥|𝘋] -> {d} || _ ,, 
[𝘦|𝘌] -> {e} || _ ,, 
[𝘧|𝘍] -> {f} || _ ,, 
[𝘨|𝘎] -> {g} || _ ,, 
[𝘩|𝘏] -> {h} || _ ,, 
[𝘪|𝘐] -> {i} || _ ,, 
[𝘫|𝘑] -> {j} || _ ,, 
[𝘬|𝘒] -> {k} || _ ,, 
[𝘭|𝘓] -> {l} || _ ,, 
[𝘮|𝘔] -> {m} || _ ,, 
[𝘯|𝘕] -> {n} || _ ,, 
[𝘰|𝘖] -> {o} || _ ,, 
[𝘱|𝘗] -> {p} || _ ,, 
[𝘲|𝘘] -> {q} || _ ,, 
[𝘳|𝘙] -> {r} || _ ,, 
[𝘴|𝘚] -> {s} || _ ,, 
[𝘵|𝘛] -> {t} || _ ,, 
[𝘶|𝘜] -> {u} || _ ,, 
[𝘷|𝘝] -> {v} || _ ,, 
[𝘸|𝘞] -> {w} || _ ,, 
[𝘹|𝘟] -> {x} || _ ,, 
[𝘺|𝘠] -> {y} || _ ,, 
[𝘻|𝘡] -> {z} || _ ,, 
[𝙖|𝘼] -> {a} || _ ,, 
[𝙗|𝘽] -> {b} || _ ,, 
[𝙘|𝘾] -> {c} || _ ,, 
[𝙙|𝘿] -> {d} || _ ,, 
[𝙚|𝙀] -> {e} || _ ,, 
[𝙛|𝙁] -> {f} || _ ,, 
[𝙜|𝙂] -> {g} || _ ,, 
[𝙝|𝙃] -> {h} || _ ,, 
[𝙞|𝙄] -> {i} || _ ,, 
[𝙟|𝙅] -> {j} || _ ,, 
[𝙠|𝙆] -> {k} || _ ,, 
[𝙡|𝙇] -> {l} || _ ,, 
[𝙢|𝙈] -> {m} || _ ,, 
[𝙣|𝙉] -> {n} || _ ,, 
[𝙤|𝙊] -> {o} || _ ,, 
[𝙥|𝙋] -> {p} || _ ,, 
[𝙦|𝙌] -> {q} || _ ,, 
[𝙧|𝙍] -> {r} || _ ,, 
[𝙨|𝙎] -> {s} || _ ,, 
[𝙩|𝙏] -> {t} || _ ,, 
[𝙪|𝙐] -> {u} || _ ,, 
[𝙫|𝙑] -> {v} || _ ,, 
[𝙬|𝙒] -> {w} || _ ,, 
[𝙭|𝙓] -> {x} || _ ,, 
[𝙮|𝙔] -> {y} || _ ,, 
[𝙯|𝙕] -> {z} || _ ,, 
[𝚊|𝙰] -> {a} || _ ,, 
[𝚋|𝙱] -> {b} || _ ,, 
[𝚌|𝙲] -> {c} || _ ,, 
[𝚍|𝙳] -> {d} || _ ,, 
[𝚎|𝙴] -> {e} || _ ,, 
[𝚏|𝙵] -> {f} || _ ,, 
[𝚐|𝙶] -> {g} || _ ,, 
[𝚑|𝙷] -> {h} || _ ,, 
[𝚒|𝙸] -> {i} || _ ,, 
[𝚓|𝙹] -> {j} || _ ,, 
[𝚔|𝙺] -> {k} || _ ,, 
[𝚕|𝙻] -> {l} || _ ,, 
[𝚖|𝙼] -> {m} || _ ,, 
[𝚗|𝙽] -> {n} || _ ,, 
[𝚘|𝙾] -> {o} || _ ,, 
[𝚙|𝙿] -> {p} || _ ,, 
[𝚚|𝚀] -> {q} || _ ,, 
[𝚛|𝚁] -> {r} || _ ,, 
[𝚜|𝚂] -> {s} || _ ,, 
[𝚝|𝚃] -> {t} || _ ,, 
[𝚞|𝚄] -> {u} || _ ,, 
[𝚟|𝚅] -> {v} || _ ,, 
[𝚠|𝚆] -> {w} || _ ,, 
[𝚡|𝚇] -> {x} || _ ,, 
[𝚢|𝚈] -> {y} || _ ,, 
[𝚣|𝚉] -> {z} || _ ,, 
# Small letters:
ᵃ -> {a} || _ ,, 
ᵇ -> {b} || _ ,, 
ᶜ -> {c} || _ ,, 
ᵈ -> {d} || _ ,, 
ᵉ -> {e} || _ ,, 
ᶠ -> {f} || _ ,, 
ᵍ -> {g} || _ ,, 
ʰ -> {h} || _ ,, 
ⁱ -> {i} || _ ,, 
ʲ -> {j} || _ ,, 
ᵏ -> {k} || _ ,, 
ˡ -> {l} || _ ,, 
ᵐ -> {m} || _ ,, 
ⁿ -> {n} || _ ,, 
ᵒ -> {o} || _ ,, 
ᵖ -> {p} || _ ,, 
ᑫ -> {q} || _ ,, 
ʳ -> {r} || _ ,, 
ˢ -> {s} || _ ,, 
ᵗ -> {t} || _ ,, 
ᵘ -> {u} || _ ,, 
ᵛ -> {v} || _ ,, 
ʷ -> {w} || _ ,, 
ˣ -> {x} || _ ,, 
ʸ -> {y} || _ ,, 
ᶻ -> {z} || _ ,, 
ᴀ -> {a} || _ ,, 
ʙ -> {b} || _ ,, 
ᴄ -> {c} || _ ,, 
ᴅ -> {d} || _ ,, 
ᴇ -> {e} || _ ,, 
ꜰ -> {f} || _ ,, 
ɢ -> {g} || _ ,, 
ʜ -> {h} || _ ,, 
ɪ -> {i} || _ ,, 
ᴊ -> {j} || _ ,, 
ᴋ -> {k} || _ ,, 
ʟ -> {l} || _ ,, 
ᴍ -> {m} || _ ,, 
ɴ -> {n} || _ ,, 
ᴏ -> {o} || _ ,, 
ᴘ -> {p} || _ ,, 
ʀ -> {r} || _ ,, 
ᴛ -> {t} || _ ,, 
ᴜ -> {u} || _ ,, 
ᴠ -> {v} || _ ,, 
ᴡ -> {w} || _ ,, 
ʏ -> {y} || _ ,, 
ᴢ -> {z} || _ ,, 
# Other
[𝑎|𝐴] -> {a} || _ ,, 
[𝑏|𝐵] -> {b} || _ ,, 
[𝑐|𝐶] -> {c} || _ ,, 
[𝑑|𝐷] -> {d} || _ ,, 
[𝑒|𝐸] -> {e} || _ ,, 
[𝑓|𝐹] -> {f} || _ ,, 
[𝑔|𝐺] -> {g} || _ ,, 
𝐻 -> {h} || _ ,, 
[𝑖|𝐼] -> {i} || _ ,, 
[𝑗|𝐽] -> {j} || _ ,, 
[𝑘|𝐾] -> {k} || _ ,, 
[𝑙|𝐿] -> {l} || _ ,, 
[𝑚|𝑀] -> {m} || _ ,, 
[𝑛|𝑁] -> {n} || _ ,, 
[𝑜|𝑂] -> {o} || _ ,, 
[𝑝|𝑃] -> {p} || _ ,, 
[𝑞|𝑄] -> {q} || _ ,, 
[𝑟|𝑅] -> {r} || _ ,, 
[𝑠|𝑆] -> {s} || _ ,, 
[𝑡|𝑇] -> {t} || _ ,, 
[𝑢|𝑈] -> {u} || _ ,, 
[𝑣|𝑉] -> {v} || _ ,, 
[𝑤|𝑊] -> {w} || _ ,, 
[𝑥|𝑋] -> {x} || _ ,, 
[𝑦|𝑌] -> {y} || _ ,, 
[𝑧|𝑍] -> {z} || _ ,, 
[𝖺|𝖠] -> {a} || _ ,, 
[𝖻|𝖡] -> {b} || _ ,, 
[𝖼|𝖢] -> {c} || _ ,, 
[𝖽|𝖣] -> {d} || _ ,, 
[𝖾|𝖤] -> {e} || _ ,, 
[𝖿|𝖥] -> {f} || _ ,, 
[𝗀|𝖦] -> {g} || _ ,, 
[𝗁|𝖧] -> {h} || _ ,, 
[𝗂|𝖨] -> {i} || _ ,, 
[𝗃|𝖩] -> {j} || _ ,, 
[𝗄|𝖪] -> {k} || _ ,, 
[𝗅|𝖫] -> {l} || _ ,, 
[𝗆|𝖬] -> {m} || _ ,, 
[𝗇|𝖭] -> {n} || _ ,, 
[𝗈|𝖮] -> {o} || _ ,, 
[𝗉|𝖯] -> {p} || _ ,, 
[𝗊|𝖰] -> {q} || _ ,, 
[𝗋|𝖱] -> {r} || _ ,, 
[𝗌|𝖲] -> {s} || _ ,, 
[𝗍|𝖳] -> {t} || _ ,, 
[𝗎|𝖴] -> {u} || _ ,, 
[𝗏|𝖵] -> {v} || _ ,, 
[𝗐|𝖶] -> {w} || _ ,, 
[𝗑|𝖷] -> {x} || _ ,, 
[𝗒|𝖸] -> {y} || _ ,, 
[𝗓|𝖹] -> {z} || _ ,, 
# Letters with parentheses.
⒜ -> {a} || _ ,, 
⒝ -> {b} || _ ,, 
⒞ -> {c} || _ ,, 
⒟ -> {d} || _ ,, 
⒠ -> {e} || _ ,, 
⒡ -> {f} || _ ,, 
⒢ -> {g} || _ ,, 
⒣ -> {h} || _ ,, 
⒤ -> {i} || _ ,, 
⒥ -> {j} || _ ,, 
⒦ -> {k} || _ ,, 
⒧ -> {l} || _ ,, 
⒨ -> {m} || _ ,, 
⒩ -> {n} || _ ,, 
⒪ -> {o} || _ ,, 
⒫ -> {p} || _ ,, 
⒬ -> {q} || _ ,, 
⒭ -> {r} || _ ,, 
⒮ -> {s} || _ ,, 
⒯ -> {t} || _ ,, 
⒰ -> {u} || _ ,, 
⒱ -> {v} || _ ,, 
⒲ -> {w} || _ ,, 
⒳ -> {x} || _ ,, 
⒴ -> {y} || _ ,, 
⒵ -> {z} || _ ,, 
# Bubble style
[ⓐ|Ⓐ] -> {a} || _ ,, 
[ⓑ|Ⓑ] -> {b} || _ ,, 
[ⓒ|Ⓒ] -> {c} || _ ,, 
[ⓓ|Ⓓ] -> {d} || _ ,, 
[ⓔ|Ⓔ] -> {e} || _ ,, 
[ⓕ|Ⓕ] -> {f} || _ ,, 
[ⓖ|Ⓖ] -> {g} || _ ,, 
[ⓗ|Ⓗ] -> {h} || _ ,, 
[ⓘ|Ⓘ] -> {i} || _ ,, 
[ⓙ|Ⓙ] -> {j} || _ ,, 
[ⓚ|Ⓚ] -> {k} || _ ,, 
[ⓛ|Ⓛ] -> {l} || _ ,, 
[ⓜ|Ⓜ] -> {m} || _ ,, 
[ⓝ|Ⓝ] -> {n} || _ ,, 
[ⓞ|Ⓞ] -> {o} || _ ,, 
[ⓟ|Ⓟ] -> {p} || _ ,, 
[ⓠ|Ⓠ] -> {q} || _ ,, 
[ⓡ|Ⓡ] -> {r} || _ ,, 
[ⓢ|Ⓢ] -> {s} || _ ,, 
[ⓣ|Ⓣ] -> {t} || _ ,, 
[ⓤ|Ⓤ] -> {u} || _ ,, 
[ⓥ|Ⓥ] -> {v} || _ ,, 
[ⓦ|Ⓦ] -> {w} || _ ,, 
[ⓧ|Ⓧ] -> {x} || _ ,, 
[ⓨ|Ⓨ] -> {y} || _ ,, 
[ⓩ|Ⓩ] -> {z} || _ ,, 
# Script letters -> {
[𝒶|𝒜] -> {a} || _ ,, 
[𝒷|ℬ] -> {b} || _ ,, 
[𝒸|𝒞] -> {c} || _ ,, 
[𝒹|𝒟] -> {d} || _ ,, 
[ℯ|ℰ] -> {e} || _ ,, 
[𝒻|ℱ] -> {f} || _ ,, 
[ℊ|𝒢] -> {g} || _ ,, 
[𝒽|ℋ] -> {h} || _ ,, 
[𝒾|ℐ] -> {i} || _ ,, 
[𝒿|𝒥] -> {j} || _ ,, 
[𝓀|𝒦] -> {k} || _ ,, 
[𝓁|ℒ] -> {l} || _ ,, 
[𝓂|ℳ] -> {m} || _ ,, 
[𝓃|𝒩] -> {n} || _ ,, 
[ℴ|𝒪] -> {o} || _ ,, 
𝓅 -> {p} || _ ,, 
[𝓆|𝒬] -> {q} || _ ,, 
[𝓇|ℛ] -> {r} || _ ,, 
[𝓈|𝒮] -> {s} || _ ,, 
[𝓉|𝒯] -> {t} || _ ,, 
[𝓊|𝒰] -> {u} || _ ,, 
[𝓋|𝒱] -> {v} || _ ,, 
[𝓌|𝒲] -> {w} || _ ,, 
[𝓍|𝒳] -> {x} || _ ,, 
[𝓎|ℐ] -> {y} || _ ,, 
[𝓏|𝒵] -> {z} || _ ,, 
# Fraktur letters -> {
[𝔞|𝔄] -> {a} || _ ,, 
[𝔟|𝔅] -> {b} || _ ,, 
[𝔠|ℭ] -> {c} || _ ,, 
[𝔡|𝔇] -> {d} || _ ,, 
[𝔢|𝔈] -> {e} || _ ,, 
[𝔣|𝔉] -> {f} || _ ,, 
[𝔤|𝔊] -> {g} || _ ,, 
[𝔥|ℌ] -> {h} || _ ,, 
𝔦 -> {i} || _ ,, 
[𝔧|𝔍] -> {j} || _ ,, 
[𝔨|𝔎] -> {k} || _ ,, 
[𝔩|𝔏] -> {l} || _ ,, 
[𝔪|𝔐] -> {m} || _ ,, 
[𝔫|𝔑] -> {n} || _ ,, 
[𝔬|𝔒] -> {o} || _ ,, 
𝔭 -> {p} || _ ,, 
[𝔮|𝔔] -> {q} || _ ,, 
𝔯 -> {r} || _ ,, 
[𝔰|𝔖] -> {s} || _ ,, 
[𝔱|𝔗] -> {t} || _ ,, 
[𝔲|𝔘] -> {u} || _ ,, 
[𝔳|𝔙] -> {v} || _ ,, 
[𝔴|𝔚] -> {w} || _ ,, 
[𝔵|𝔛] -> {x} || _ ,, 
𝔶 -> {y} || _ ,, 
[𝔷|ℨ] -> {z} || _ ,, 
# Double-struck letters -> {
𝕒 -> {a} || _ ,, 
[𝕓|𝔹] -> {b} || _ ,, 
𝕔 -> {c} || _ ,, 
[𝕕|𝔻] -> {d} || _ ,, 
[𝕖|𝔼] -> {e} || _ ,, 
[𝕗|𝔽] -> {f} || _ ,, 
[𝕘|𝔾] -> {g} || _ ,, 
𝕙 -> {h} || _ ,, 
[𝕚|𝕀] -> {i} || _ ,, 
𝕛 -> {j} || _ ,, 
[𝕜|𝕂] -> {k} || _ ,, 
[𝕝|𝕃] -> {l} || _ ,, 
[𝕞|𝕄] -> {m} || _ ,, 
𝕟 -> {n} || _ ,, 
[𝕠|𝕆] -> {o} || _ ,, 
[𝕡|ℙ] -> {p} || _ ,, 
𝕢 -> {q} || _ ,, 
𝕣 -> {r} || _ ,, 
[𝕤|𝕊] -> {s} || _ ,, 
[𝕥|𝕋] -> {t} || _ ,, 
[𝕦|𝕌] -> {u} || _ ,, 
[𝕧|𝕍] -> {v} || _ ,, 
[𝕨|𝕎] -> {w} || _ ,, 
[𝕩|𝕏] -> {x} || _ ,, 
[𝕪|𝕀] -> {y} || _ ,, 
𝕫 -> {z} || _ ,, 
# Subscript letters -> {
ₐ -> {a} || _ ,, 
ₑ -> {e} || _ ,, 
ₕ -> {h} || _ ,, 
ᵢ -> {i} || _ ,, 
ⱼ -> {j} || _ ,, 
ₖ -> {k} || _ ,, 
ₗ -> {l} || _ ,, 
ₘ -> {m} || _ ,, 
ₙ -> {n} || _ ,, 
ₒ -> {o} || _ ,, 
ₚ -> {p} || _ ,, 
ᵣ -> {r} || _ ,, 
ₛ -> {s} || _ ,, 
ₜ -> {t} || _ ,, 
ᵤ -> {u} || _ ,, 
ᵥ -> {v} || _ ,, 
ₓ -> {x} || _ ,, 
# Outlined letters -> {
𜳖 -> {a} || _ ,, 
𜳗 -> {b} || _ ,, 
𜳘 -> {c} || _ ,, 
𜳙 -> {d} || _ ,, 
𜳚 -> {e} || _ ,, 
𜳛 -> {f} || _ ,, 
𜳜 -> {g} || _ ,, 
𜳝 -> {h} || _ ,, 
𜳞 -> {i} || _ ,, 
𜳟 -> {j} || _ ,, 
𜳠 -> {k} || _ ,, 
𜳡 -> {l} || _ ,, 
𜳢 -> {m} || _ ,, 
𜳣 -> {n} || _ ,, 
𜳤 -> {o} || _ ,, 
𜳥 -> {p} || _ ,, 
𜳦 -> {q} || _ ,, 
𜳧 -> {r} || _ ,, 
𜳨 -> {s} || _ ,, 
𜳩 -> {t} || _ ,, 
𜳪 -> {u} || _ ,, 
𜳫 -> {v} || _ ,, 
𜳬 -> {w} || _ ,, 
𜳭 -> {x} || _ ,, 
𜳞 -> {y} || _ ,, 
𜳯 -> {z} || _ ,, 
# Misc stylized chars:
[𝕬|𝖆] -> {a} || _ ,, 
[𝕭|𝖇] -> {b} || _ ,, 
[𝕮|𝖈] -> {c} || _ ,, 
[𝕯|𝖉] -> {d} || _ ,, 
[𝕰|𝖊] -> {e} || _ ,, 
[𝕱|𝖋] -> {f} || _ ,, 
[𝕲|𝖌] -> {g} || _ ,, 
[𝕳|𝖍] -> {h} || _ ,, 
[𝕴|𝖎] -> {i} || _ ,, 
[𝕵|𝖏] -> {j} || _ ,, 
[𝕶|𝖐] -> {k} || _ ,, 
[𝕷|𝖑] -> {l} || _ ,, 
[𝕸|𝖒] -> {m} || _ ,, 
[𝕹|𝖓] -> {n} || _ ,, 
[𝕺|𝖔] -> {o} || _ ,, 
[𝕻|𝖕] -> {p} || _ ,, 
[𝕼|𝖖] -> {q} || _ ,, 
[𝕽|𝖗] -> {r} || _ ,, 
[𝕾|𝖘] -> {s} || _ ,, 
[𝕿|𝖙] -> {t} || _ ,, 
[𝖀|𝖚] -> {u} || _ ,, 
[𝖁|𝖛] -> {v} || _ ,, 
[𝖂|𝖜] -> {w} || _ ,, 
[𝖃|𝖝] -> {x} || _ ,, 
[𝖄|𝖞] -> {y} || _ ,, 
[𝖅|𝖟] -> {z} || _ ,, 
[ą|ă|Ą|Ă|ā|Ā] -> {a} || _ ,, 
[𝑨|𝒂] -> {a} || _ ,, 
[𝓐|𝓪] -> {a} || _ ,, 
[𝑩|𝒃] -> {b} || _ ,, 
[𝓑|𝓫] -> {b} || _ ,, 
[Ć|ć|Ĉ|ĉ|Ċ|ċ|Č|č] -> {c} || _ ,, 
[𝑪|𝒄] -> {c} || _ ,, 
[𝓒|𝓬] -> {c} || _ ,, 
[Ď|ď|Đ|đ] -> {d} || _ ,, 
[𝑫|𝒅] -> {d} || _ ,, 
[𝓓|𝓭] -> {d} || _ ,, 
[Ē|ē|Ĕ|ĕ|Ė|ė|Ę|ę|Ě|ě] -> {e} || _ ,, 
[𝑬|𝒆] -> {e} || _ ,, 
[𝓔|𝓮] -> {e} || _ ,, 
[𝑭|𝒇] -> {f} || _ ,, 
[𝓕|𝓯] -> {f} || _ ,, 
[Ĝ|ĝ|Ğ|ğ|Ġ|ġ|Ģ|ģ] -> {g} || _ ,, 
[𝑮|𝒈] -> {g} || _ ,, 
[𝓖|𝓰] -> {g} || _ ,, 
[Ĥ|ĥ|Ħ|ħ] -> {h} || _ ,, 
[𝑯|𝒉] -> {h} || _ ,, 
[𝓗|𝓱] -> {h} || _ ,, 
[Ĩ|ĩ|Ī|ī|Ĭ|ĭ|Į|į|İ|ı] -> {i} || _ ,, 
[𝑰|𝒊] -> {i} || _ ,, 
[𝓘|𝓲] -> {i} || _ ,, 
[Ĵ|ĵ] -> {j} || _ ,, 
[𝑱|𝒋] -> {j} || _ ,, 
[𝓙|𝓳] -> {j} || _ ,, 
[Ķ|ķ] -> {k} || _ ,, 
[𝑲|𝒌] -> {k} || _ ,, 
[𝓚|𝓴] -> {k} || _ ,, 
[Ĺ|ĺ|Ļ|ļ|Ľ|ľ|Ł|ł] -> {l} || _ ,, 
[𝑳|𝒍] -> {l} || _ ,, 
[𝓛|𝓵] -> {l} || _ ,, 
[𝑴|𝒎] -> {m} || _ ,, 
[𝓜|𝓶] -> {m} || _ ,, 
[𝑵|𝒏] -> {n} || _ ,, 
[𝓝|𝓷] -> {n} || _ ,, 
[Ń|ń|Ņ|ņ|Ň|ň] -> {n} || _ ,, 
[Ō|ō|Ŏ|ŏ|Ő|ő|Œ|œ] -> {o} || _ ,, 
[𝑶|𝒐] -> {o} || _ ,, 
[𝓞|𝓸] -> {o} || _ ,, 
[𝑷|𝒑] -> {p} || _ ,, 
[𝓟|𝓹] -> {p} || _ ,, 
[𝑸|𝒒] -> {q} || _ ,, 
[𝓠|𝓺] -> {q} || _ ,, 
[Ŕ|ŕ|Ŗ|ŗ|Ř|ř] -> {r} || _ ,, 
[𝑹|𝒓] -> {r} || _ ,, 
[𝓡|𝓻] -> {r} || _ ,, 
[Ś|ś|Ŝ|ŝ|Ş|ş] -> {s} || _ ,, 
[𝑺|𝒔] -> {s} || _ ,, 
[𝓢|𝓼] -> {s} || _ ,, 
[Ţ|ţ|Ť|ť|Ŧ|ŧ] -> {t} || _ ,, 
[𝑻|𝒕] -> {t} || _ ,, 
[𝓣|𝓽] -> {t} || _ ,, 
[Ũ|ũ|Ū|ū|Ŭ|ŭ|Ů|ů|Ű|ű|Ų|ų] -> {u} || _ ,, 
[𝑼|𝒖] -> {u} || _ ,, 
[𝓤|𝓾] -> {u} || _ ,, 
[𝑽|𝒗] -> {v} || _ ,, 
[𝓥|𝓿] -> {v} || _ ,, 
[Ŵ|ŵ] -> {w} || _ ,, 
[𝑾|𝒘] -> {w} || _ ,, 
[𝓦|𝔀] -> {w} || _ ,, 
[𝑿|𝒙] -> {x} || _ ,, 
[𝓧|𝔁] -> {x} || _ ,, 
[Ŷ|ŷ] -> {y} || _ ,, 
[𝒀|𝒚] -> {y} || _ ,, 
[𝓨|𝔂] -> {y} || _ ,, 
[Ý|ý] -> {y} || _ ,, 
[𝒁|𝒛] -> {z} || _ ,, 
[𝓩|𝔃] -> {z} || _ ,, 
[Ź|ź|Ż|ż] -> {z} || _ ; 

regex 
NormalizeCharactersBase ; 
